Utah statutes.
53A-11-602.   Self-administration of asthma medication.
(1)  As used in this section, "asthma medication" means prescription or
nonprescription, inhaled asthma medication.
(2)  A public school shall permit a student to possess and self-administer
asthma medication if:
(a)  the student's parent or guardian signs a statement:
(i)  authorizing the student to self-administer asthma medication; and
(ii)  acknowledging that the student is responsible for, and capable of, self-
administering the asthma medication; and
(b)  the student's health care provider provides a written statement that
states:
(i)  it is medically appropriate for the student to self-administer asthma
medication and be in possession of asthma medication at all times; and
(ii)  the name of the asthma medication prescribed or authorized for the
student's use.
(3)  The Utah Department of Health, in cooperation with the state
superintendent of public instruction, shall design forms to be used by public
schools for the parental and health care provider statements described in
Subsection (2).
(4)  Section 53A-11-904 does not apply to the possession and self-
administration of asthma medication in accordance with this section.
